xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-ruhyphvl.tex
% Russian hyphenation patterns
% 2004-06-03 converted to Unicode for XeTeX, Jonathan Kew
%
% This code was written by Dimitri Vulis and placed into public domain.
% Modified by M.Vorontsova and S.Lvovski. Version date: 24.02.96
\patterns{
.ади2
.аль5
.ас6к
.ави2
.аш1
.бе2з1у2
.ди2а
.до1см
.дво2е
.хла2
.иг2
.ис1ти
.ис5тр
.из1н
.кри1п
.ле1м
.ль2
.ме2ж5
.ми2нат
.мо2г1л
.на5в6
.на1ч2н
.неа6
.не5л
.не1в
.не6ври
.не1з2
.нос5к
.об1ле
.об5лит
.об5лив
.об1ло
.об1ре
.об1ру
.обь1
.ог1н
.ос2п
.ото1м
.от1р
.от3в
.оз2
.по1в2
.по1ж2
.пре1л
.прос2
.ра2с1та
.реги6о
.сеп5т
.соп1л
.тек1с
.топ1л
.тран2с1
.ть2
.уд2л
.ук2
.ур6в
.во2ск
.выпу2к
.выпукл1
.зас2
.зау2
.заш2
.зо2о3
.ча2е
.чер2с
.черст5
.че2ст1в
а1а
аа6б
а1ба
а1бе
абе3с
а1бх
а1би
а1бо
а1бр
а1бу
а1бы
а1бье
а1бьи
а1бья
а1бью
а1бя
а1бю
а1ца
а1це
а1ци
а1цо
а1цу
а1да
ад1аге
а1дц
а1де
а1ди
ади2о
1адм
а1до
а1дра
ад5рез
а1ду
а5дви
а1дж
а1ды
адь2
а1дье
а1дьи
а1дья
а1дью
а1дя
а1дю
а1е
а1фа
а1фе
а1фи
а1фо
а1фу
а1фье
а1фьи
а1фья
а1фью
а1фя
а1фю
а1га
ага5с6
аг1д
а1ге
а1ги
а1гл
а1го
1агро
а3гу
а5гв
а1гы
а1гье
а1гьи
а1гья
а1гью
а1гя
а1гю
а1ха
а1хе
а1хи
а1хо
а1ху
а1хы
а1хье
а1хьи
а1хья
а1хью
а1хя
а1хю
а1и
аи2г
а2их
аи2ни
аи6з5
ай2ма
а1ка
а1ке
а1ки
ак1н
а1ко
акоп5л
ак1с
а1ку
а1кы
а1кье
а1кьи
а1кья
а1кью
а1кя
а1кю
а1ла
а1ле
1алг
а5ли
а1ло
а1лу
а1лы
а1лье
а1льи
а1лья
а1лью
а1ля
а1лю
2а1ма
а1ме
а1ми
а1мно
а1мо
1ампе
а1му
а1мы
а1мье
а1мьи
а1мья
а1мью
а1мя
ам1ч
а1мю
а1на
а1не
а1ни
а6нинс
ан2кр
а1но
а2н1об
а1нр
ан2сц
ан2скр
ан2сп
анс1у
ан2сур
а1ну
а2н5уз
а1ны
а1нье
а1ньи
а1нья
а1нью
а1ня
а1ню
2а3о
ао6к
ао2п
ао2с
а1п
а1па
а1пе
а1пи
а1по
1апп
а1пу
а1пы
а1пье
а1пьи
а1пья
а1пью
а1пя
а1пю
а5щ
а1ща
а1ще
а1щи
а1що
а1щу
а1щье
а1щьи
а1щья
а1щью
а1р6а
а1ре
а1ри
а1ро
ар2т1ор
а1ру
а1ры
а1рье
а1рьи
а1рья
а1рью
а1ря
а1рю
а1са
а1се
асе5п
ас1х
а1си
ас1к
ас5лет
ас5лях
ас5лям
ас5ми
а1со
ас3по
ас1пу
асс6п
а1ста
а1сте
а1сти
а2с1тир
а1сто
ас1трог
а5стры
а1сту
аст1ву
а1сты
а1стье
а1стьи
а1стья
а1стью
а1стя
а6с5тяг
а6стян
а1стю
а1су
а1с2ше
а1сы
а1сье
а1сьи
а1сья
а1сью
а1ся
ас1ч
а1сю
а1та
1атак
а1те
ате2с1
а1ти
а1то
а6томн
а1тр
а1ту
ат5ви
а1ты
а1тье
а1тьи
а1тья
а1тью
а1тя
а1тю
а1у
а2уле
а2ум
а2ун
а2ус
ау5ск
аут1р
ау2чи
а2уэ
а1ва
а5ве
а5ви
а1во
а2вот
а1ву
а1вы
а1вье
а1вьи
а1вья
а1вью
а1вя
а1вю
а1ша
а1ше
а1ши
а1шо
аш1та
а1шу
а1шье
а1шьи
а1шья
а1шью
а1жа
а1же
а1жи
а1жм
а1жо
а1жу
а1жж
а1жье
а1жьи
а1жья
а1жью
а1жя
а1жю
а1ы
а1за
аз1да
а1зе
а1зи
а1зо
аз1р
а5з6у
аз1ве
аз1ви
аз1во
а1зы
азъ1
а1зье
а1зьи
а1зья
а1зью
а1зя
а1зю
а1я
ая2з
а1ча
а1че
а1чи
а1ч2не
ач5та
а1чу
а1чье
а1чьи
а1чья
а1чью
а1э1
а2эр
а1ю
ба1с2к
бас1м
б1аэ
6б1б
2б1ц
2б1д
1бе
бе1др
бег1л
бе2ск
2бес3п
бесс2
бе2ста
бес1ч
без1д2
бе2з1и
без5в
б1ф
6б1г
б1х
5би2о
био5с
би5стр
2б5к
1бл
2блас
б1лав
2блд
б1лег
бле2с1к
б5лим
бл1исп
б5лиза
б1лом
б1лож
2бль
6б1м
2б1н
5боц
бо1д6р
б5оке
б5орб
борт5
бор6тр
бо1рв
бо1с
босо2б1
бос2с
5бот
бо1т2л
бо1жж
бо1з
бп5л
6б1щ
2бр.
бра6сл
1бри
б5рыд
б5рыг
б1рыв
2брь
6б1с2
бст6
2б1т
1бу
бу1г
5бв
б1ва
б1во
б1вя
б1ш
б1ж
б1з6
бзд6
бъ1
бь1яв
1бя
б1ч
1бю
5ца.
1цам
ц1б
ц1ц
ц1д
1це
це5д
цей6т5
6ценни
2ц1г
1ци
2ц1к
2ц1л
2ц1м
ц1н
1цо
ц1о2б
2ц1о2д
2ц1от
ц1п
ц1р
2ц1с
ц1т
1цв
1цы
2ц1з
ц5ч
да2ген
2далг
да2пр
6д1б
д1д
5деб
де1гл
де5х
де2о
дес2к
де1ст
де2з1а2
де2з1и2о
де2з1о2
2д1ф
д1г2
д1х
ди2ад
ди2ам
ди5х
2д1инф
ди2об
ди5он
ди2о5с
дип5т
ди2с1е
ди2сто
дис1тр
2д1к
д1л
5д6лей
1д2лев
1д2лил
2д1м
дмо1с
д2мс
д1н
1дневн
дно5д
2дны
1дняш
5до.
2д1обл
до6бла
до1бр
6добъ
до1д2
2докт
до5мно
до1п
до2ру
до5рва
2д1о2си
до1сн
до1с2п
5дот
6дотд
дото1
1дов
до1ш2
до1з
1доч
д1п
2др.
д1рас
1д6раж
д6рая
д1реж
1дроб
1дром
6д5роз
2дрс
д1руб
д1рыв
д1ряд
2д1с
дс3кн
д1т
1дун
ду2о
ду1п
ду1ст
д1ва
д1ве
две2с1к
д1вид
5двину
д1вис
1движ
1двиз
д1вод
дву1ш
2д1ш2
5джа
дж1м
дж1р
6дз.
д1за
1дзе.
д5зем
д5зи
д1зо
дъ1
6дь.
1дье
1дья
5дью
д1ч
д1э
е1а
еа6да
еа2де
еа2з
е1ба
е1бе
е1би
е1бо
е1бр
е1бу
е1бы
е1бье
е1бьи
е1бья
е1бью
е1бя
е1бю
е1ца
е1це
е1ци
е1цо
е1цу
е1да
е2д1ап
е1де
е1ди
е2д1ию
е1до
едоу5к
е1ду
е6д5у6г
е5дже
е1ды
е1дье
е1дьи
е1дья
е1дью
е1дя
е1дю
е1е
е6ема
е2ева
е1фа
е1фе
е1фи
е1фо
е1фу
е1фье
е1фьи
е1фья
е1фью
е1фя
е1фю
е1га
е1гд
е1ге
е1ги
ег1ла.
ег1ло
ег1лы
ег1н
ег6нат
е5г6но
е1го
е1гу
е1гы
е1гье
е1гьи
е1гья
е1гью
е1гя
е1гю
е1ха
е1хе
е1хи
ех1м
е1хо
ех5об
е1ху
е1хы
е1хье
е1хьи
е1хья
е1хью
е1хя
е1хю
е1и
еи2д
еи2г
еи2м
е1ка
е1ке
е1ки
ек1н
2е1ко
ек1ск
екс2п
ек1сту
е1ку
е1кв
е1кы
е1кье
е1кьи
е1кья
е1кью
е1кя
е1кю
е1ла
е1ле
е1ли
е1ло
е1лу
е1лы
е1лье
е1льи
е1лья
е1лью
е1ля
е1лю
е1ма
е1ме
е5ми
ем1не
е1мо
е1му
е1мы
е1мье
е1мьи
е1мья
е1мью
е1мя
ем1ч
е1мю
е1на
е1не
е1ни
е1но
2енр
ен5ре
ен1ри
е1ну
е1ны
е1нье
е1ньи
е1нья
е1нью
е1ня
е1ню
2е1о
ео2б
еоб1л
е2оди
е5охл
ео6хв
ео2кон
е5ол.
е3ола
е5олы
е5оля
е3он.
е2она
ео2пр
ео2щ
е2оро
ео2ру
ео1с
ео2са
ео2се
ео6су
ео6св
ео6ш
ео2ж
ео2ч
е1па
е1пе
е1пи
еп1ле
еп5ли.
е1по
еп1та
еп5те
еп5тич
еп1то
еп5тур
е1пу
е1пы
е1пье
е1пьи
е1пья
е1пью
е1пя
е1пю
е1ща
е1ще
е1щи
е1що
е1щу
е1щье
е1щьи
е1щья
е1щью
е1ра
ер1аэ
е1ре
ере1дв
ере5гн
ере1п
ере1сс
ере1зв
ер2хи
е1ри
ерис2
ери1ск
ер6кл
е1ро
еро6б
ер5тли
ер1тя
е1ру
е2р1у2п
ер1ват
е1ры
е1рье
е1рьи
е1рья
е1рью
е1ря
е1рю
е1са
е1сб
е1сд
е1се
е1с2г
е1си
е1ск
ескрип1
ес5кур
е1см
е1со
ес1п
е2с3пу
ес5ра
е1ста
е5ста.
ес1тар
е1сте
е1сти
е6стиг
е1сто
е1стр
е1сту
е1ств
е1сты
е1стье
е1стьи
е1стья
е1стью
е1стя
е1стю
е1су
ес5ва
е1сы
е1сье
е1сьи
е1сья
е1сью
е1ся
е1сю
е1та
е1те
е1ти
е1тл
е1то
етора5
е1тр
е1ту
е1тв
е1ты
е1тье
е1тьи
е1тья
е1тью
е1тя
е1тю
е1у2
еу3то
е1ва
е1ве
е1ви
ев6ку
ев2ним
ев2нят
е1во
6евол
ево2с
ев2п
2евр
е2вро
е1ву
е1вы
6евыд
е1вье
е1вьи
е1вья
е1вью
е1вя
ев1ч
е1вю
е1ша
е1ше
е1ши
е1шл
е1шо
е1шта
еш1то
е1шу
е1шье
е1шьи
е1шья
е1шью
е1жа
ежа6т
е1же
е5жи
еж1м
е1жо
еж1р
е1жу
е1жж
е1жье
е1жьи
е1жья
е1жью
е1жя
е1жю
е1ы
е1за
ез1да
ез1др
е1зе
е1зи
е1зо
е1зу
ез5ви
ез1во
е1зы
е1зье
е1зьи
е1зья
е1зью
е1зя
е1зю
е1я
е1ча
е1че
е1чи
е1чу
е1чье
е1чьи
е1чья
е1чью
е1э
е1ю
1фа
фаг1н
фар5в
фа5у
фе1д
фем5н
фени6
фе2с1к
ф1ф
ф1г
1фи
фи1д
фи6нин
фи3о
фи1с2к
ф1к
1фл
ф1м
2ф1н
1фо
2ф1обр
фо5е
2ф1орг
фото1
ф1п
1фр6
6фр.
фра5с
ф6ре
фре6с5
2ф1с
ф1т
1фтонг
ф2т1р
ф6тв
2ф1в
ф1ш
1фы
6фь.
1га
га5др
га1ст
га2у
2г1б
г1ц
ге2н1ин
ге6об
ге2оц
ге2од
ге2оп
ге2ос
г1г
2г1х
ги1с
2г1к
гко1в
6гл.
6г5лай
1глам
5глем
г1ляе
г1лят
г1ляю
2г1м
г1ни
го1п
1гор
го2с1а
го2сб
гос1к
гос3с
го2с1тр
го1сш
го1з
2г1п
1гр
6грек
2гроп
2г1с
2г5т
2г1ш
г1з
г1ч
г1э
хаб2
2х1а2д
2х1анг
ха2т
х1ато
х1б
х1ц
х1д6
хе6о5
х1ф6
2х1г
х1х
1хи
хие2
х1изл
х1к
х5ла.
х1ли
х1лу
х1лы
х1ля
х1ма
х5мет
х1ми
х1н
2х1о2к
5хом
хо2пе
3хор
х5осм
х1осн
хо5т6л
хо1тв
5хоу
5хоз
х1п
1хр
хри2п1
2х1с
хс2х
хс1ка
х1т
х2тк
1ху.
ху2ер
2х1у2г
х1ул
х1ур
2х1у2ч
1хв
6хв.
2х1ве
6х5ви
х1ш
х1з
6х1ч
х1э
и1а
и2аф
и2а1г
и2ап
иас2
иа1ск
2и1б
и1ба
и1бе
и1би
и1бо
и1бу
и1бы
и1бье
и1бьи
и1бья
и1бью
и1бя
и1бю
и1ца
и1це
и1ци
и1цо
и1цу
и1да
ид1ц
и1де
и2дей
и1ди
иди5а
иди3ом
и1до
и1др
и1ду
и1ды
и1дье
и1дьи
и1дья
и1дью
и1дя
и1дю
и1е
и1фа
и1фе
и1фи
и1фо
и1фу
и1фье
и1фьи
и1фья
и1фью
и1фя
и1фю
и1га
и5гд
и1ге
и1ги
и1гл
иг1н
и1го
и1гу
и1гы
и1гье
и1гьи
и1гья
и1гью
и1гя
и1гю
и1ха
и1хе
и1хи
и1хо
и1ху
и1хы
и1хье
и1хьи
и1хья
и1хью
и1хя
и1хю
и1и
ии2з
и1ка
и1ке
и1ки
ик1н
и1ко
ик1ск
икс1ту
и1ку
и1кв
и1кы
и1кье
и1кьи
и1кья
и1кью
и1кя
и5к6ч
и1кю
и1ла
и2л1а2ц
и1ле
иле1п
и1ли
и1ло
и1лу
и1лы
и1лье
и1льи
и1лья
и1лью
и1ля
и1лю
и1ма
и1ме
2имене
и2мено
2имень
и5ми
им1н
и1мо
и1му
и1мы
и1мье
и1мьи
и1мья
и1мью
и1мя
и1мю
и1на
ин1атом
и1не
и1ни
и1но
ино5с
ин1р
инс2
5инсп
и1ну
5инж
и1ны
и1нье
и1ньи
и1нья
и1нью
и1ня
и1н1ю
и1о
и2оц
и2ох
и2ок6
и5оле
и2опр
и3орт
иос2
и2о1ск
ио5сп
ио2ста
6ип
и1па
и5пе
и1пи
и1пл
и2п1лы
и1по
и1пс
и6п5тиз
ип1ту
и1пу
и1пы
и1пье
и1пьи
и1пья
и1пью
и1пя
и1пю
и1ща
и1ще
и1щи
и1що
и1щу
и1щье
и1щьи
и1щья
и1щью
и1ра
и1ре
и1ри
и1ро
и1ру
ир5в
и1ры
и1рье
и1рьи
и1рья
и1рью
и1ря
и1рю
и1са
ис1б
и1се
и1си
ис1к
иск1н
ис1м
и1с2ни
и1со
ис1п
ис2пас
и1ста
и1сте
ис5тец
ис1тек
и1сти
и1сто
и1стра
и1сту
ист1в
и1сты
и1стье
и1стьи
и1стья
и1стью
и1стя
и1стю
и1су
и1сы
и2съ
и1сье
и1сьи
и1сья
и1сью
и1ся
ис1ч
и1сю
и5та
и1те
и1ти
и1тл
и1то
и6тот
и1тр
и1ту
и2т1уп
ит1уч
ит1ва
ит1ве
ит5ву
и1ты
и1тье
и1тьи
и1тья
и1тью
и1тя
и1тю
и1у
иу2г
иу6р
иу2ч
и1ва
и1ве
и1ви
и1во
и1в2с
и1ву
2и1вы
и1вье
и1вьи
и1вья
и1вью
и1вя
и1вю
и1ша
и1ше
и1ши
и1шл
и1шо
и1ш2п
и1шу
и1шье
и1шьи
и1шья
и1шью
и1жа
и1же
и1жи
и1жо
и1жу
и1жж
и1жье
и1жьи
и1жья
и1жью
и1жя
и1жю
и1ы
и1за
из1д
и1зе
из2гн
изг1не
и1зи
и1зна
и1зо
изо2о
изо1т
и1зр
из5ре
и1зу
из1в
из2ва
и1зы
изы1с
изъ5
и1зье
и1зьи
и1зья
и1зью
и1зя
и1зю
и1я
ия2д
и1ча
и1че
и1чи
и1чу
и1чье
и1чьи
и1чья
и1чью
и1э
и1ю
и2юл
и2юн
й1
й2дн
й2д1р
й2дв
йер5
й2х
йх2ск
йко5п
й2ль
йм1а
й5о
й2п1т
й2с1б
й6с5ф
йс1кур
й2сн
й6с5тр
й2сш
ка1д
1кае
2каф
кам5н
1кап
ка2п1л
кап6ла
ка1сп
ка1ст
1кат
ка1тл
ка3ус
1кав
2казк
1каю
2к1б
2к1ц
к1д
6кеа
ке5д
ке5гли
ке5пти
ке1ст
6к1ф
2к1г
к1х
кик1с
ки5о
1кив
2к1к
1кл
2кл.
2к1лак
к5лий
2кль
2к1м
2кн
к1на
3к6ниж
к1но
5коа
ко1д2н
ког2н
ко2мин
1комп
1кон
1коо
копу5
к1орг
кор1в
5коры
1кос
ко1ск
кос1мо
кос5н
ко5ств
ко2св
ко1т2л
5ковы
1кош
ко5зн
к1п
1кр
6кр.
кри2о5
2кс
к1сх
к1ски
к2с1л
к6с1м
кс1п
к5сте.
кс1тр
к6св
к5сю
2к1т
5к6то.
куг1
кус1к
ку6тл
6кв.
2к1ш
к5ж
2к1я
к1ч
к1э
ла2г1л
1ланд
лау1
л1ба
л1би
л1бо
л5бы
л1ц
л1д6
1леде
лег5л
ле2о
леп5ло
ле6ст5в
ле6в5ра
л1ф
л1г
л2гат
л1х6
5лицо
ли6ени
5лиг
ли6х5в
лио5
ли6ос
ли1пт
ли1спа
ли5стр
ли2тоб
ли2в1л
5личи
л1к
лк1н
л1л
л2ль
ллю1
л1м
л6мщ
2л1н
лобо1
ло6бор
ло1д6р
ло5дж
лох5л
лос5ка
ло1ску
ло5ств
ло5вд
ло1з
л1п
л1щ
6л1с2
л1т
л2тк
л6т5л
лу1д2
лу5с
лу5т
л1в
л6вк
л1ш6
л1жа
л5ж6б
л1же
5л6жеш
л1жи
л1жь
л1за
л1зд
л1зе
л1зо
6ль.
1льо
6льш
1лью
л1ча
л5че
л1чь
люк1в
1маг
маг1н
ма1сб
м6ат
ма2т1ан
ма2тоб
ма5тв
ма2у
мау2т
ма2вз
ма6чт
6м1б
м1ц
5мед
ме2д1о
1мей
1мен.
ме2о
ме2ж1д
м1ф
м1г
м5х
5мий
5минг
ми2ню
ми6з5ан
2м1изд
м1к
1мкн
2м1л
м6ль
6м1м
м2м1н
м2м1ч
м1на
м5неп
м5ний
м1ное
много1
м1нос
м5нот
м5нов
мо1м
1мон
мо3о
мо5п
мо1ско
моск1в
5моти
2мотп
6м1п
мп2л
мпо2ч
1мще
м1с
м2сб
мс2н
м2с1ор
мс6п
мс2с
м2сти
6м1т
му5г
му5с6к
2м1в2
1мш
1мы.
м1з
6м1че
м1чис
м5э
м1ю2с
1на.
5нац
1над
1на1г
на1х
на2ил
на1кв
на1мн
5нап
на1рв
1на1с2
нау6ч
1на1ш2
на1з2
3ная
на5э
н1б
2н1ц
н1д
н6дц
нде2с5
н2дл
н2дн
н6дт
н2дв
нд6з
не1др
нее6
не1гл
неи2
не5кст
не1мн
нео2ц
не3о2гр
нео2х
нео2п
нео2р
нео6сто
не1п2
не5рж
не1с2ф
не5с6х
нес2к
не1с2н
не1с2п
не1ст
не1сч
неу5стр
не1в2д
6невк
2невн
не2вра
нев5рит
нев1ро
нев6т
не1зн
нея6
н1ф
н1г
н2г1д
нгоу5
н1х
5ниб
1ниц
3ник
ни5кт
нила6
нил5ам
ни5ок
ни5п
ни1стр
2н1изд
н1к
нко1п
нк5ро
н1л
н1м
н1н
1но.
но5е
1нох
1ной
1ном
ном5н
но5о
но1п
ноп6л
2нотд
но5тк
но1тв
но5ш
но1з
н1п
н1щ
6нр.
1нра
2н1с
н2с1д
н2сф
н2с1ля
н2с1м
н2сн
нсу2р
н2с1в
н1т
нтиа2
нтио2
н2тк
нт2р
н2трад
нтр1и2гр
нтр5у6п
ну1ск
ну1тр
нуз2
ну6зе
1ную
н1в2
2н1ш
н1ж
3ны
н1з
нъ1
1ньо
1нью
1ня
2няш
н1ч
н1э
ню2с
2о1а2
оанаби5
о6а5та
6о5ба
о1бе
1обес
о1би
о2благ
об5лик
об5лич
об1лу
о1бо
обо1л
1о2боз
об5рад
об5рам
об5рас
о1бу
об1в
о1бы
1объ
о1бье
о1бьи
о1бья
о1бью
о2бя
о1бю
о1ца
о1це
о1ци
о2цо
о1цу
о1да
о2д1ад
6одар
о1де
о1ди
оди5ап
од2лит
о1до
одо1с
од1ра
од1рос
о1дру
о1ду
о2д1у2р
о5двиг
о1ды
одь1
о1дье
о1дьи
о1дья
о1дью
о1дя
о1дю
о1е
ое2д
ое6с
о2ет
о2евл
2оф
о1фа
о1фе
о1фи
о1фо
офо2р
о2ф1ори
офос5
о1фу
о1фье
о1фьи
о1фья
о1фью
о1фя
о1фю
2о1г
о1га
о1ге
о1ги
о1го
о1гу
о1гы
о1гье
о1гьи
о1гья
о1гью
о1гя
о1гю
о1ха
о1хе
2о1хи
о1хо
6охор
2о5хро
о5х6т
о1ху
о1хы
о1хье
о1хьи
о1хья
о1хью
о1хя
о1хю
2о1и
ои2г6
ои2ме
ои2му
ои6о
ои2з
о1ка
о2к1а2у
о1ке
о1ки
6окл
ок5не
ок1ну
о1ко
6окол
1окт
о1ку
о1кв
о1кы
ок1з
о1кье
о1кьи
о1кья
о1кью
о1кя
о1кю
2ол
о1ла
о1ле
о5ли
о3ло
о1лу
олуо2
о1лы
о1лье
о1льи
о1лья
о1лью
о1ля
о1лю
2ом
о1ма
о1ме
о1ми
ом1инт
3омме
ом2ня
о1мо
ом2п1т
ом1р
о1му
о1мы
о1мье
о1мьи
о1мья
о1мью
о1мя
о1мч
о2мю
о1на
о1не
о1ни
о1но
он5р
онс2
он2трат
он6тру
о1ну
о1ны
о1нье
о1ньи
о1нья
о1нью
о1ня
о1ню
о1о2
о5оа
о2охо
оок6с
о5ом
о1па
опале5
о1пе
о1пи
2опир
о1по
о5пте
оп5ту
о1пу
о1пы
о1пье
о1пьи
о1пья
о1пью
о1пя
о1пю
о1ща
о1ще
о1щи
о1що
о1щу
о1щье
о1щьи
о1щья
о1щью
о1ра
о2ралг
орас6пр
о1ре
о1ри
ори3ол
ор1исп
о1ро
ор5ть
ор5тя
о1ру
о5ру.
ор5уз
о1рват
ор2вы
2о1ры
о1рье
о1рьи
о1рья
о1рью
о1ря
о1рю
о1са
о1сб
ос5ба
о1се
2осф
о1си
о6с5из
ос1ка.
ос1ках
ос1кам
ос1ке
ос1ки
ос1кой
ос1ку.
ос5ми
ос1мос
ос2н
о1сне
о1сним
ос5нит
2о1со
о1спе
ос6пле
о5спу
ос2ско
ос2с1м
ос2сп
ос2св
о1ста
2остал
о1сте
о1сти
о1с6то
о1стр
о1сту
о1сты
о1стье
о1стьи
о1стья
о1стью
